Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission

34.310.
Membership.

The members of the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission to be selected from among the Judges of the Court of Appeals, the Circuit Judges, and the District Judges, shall be selected according to rules promulgated by the Supreme Court.

The member of the commission to be appointed by the governing body of the bar shall be appointed according to rules promulgated by the Supreme Court.

The members of the commission appointed by the Governor shall include one (1) person from each of the two (2) political parties of the Commonwealth having the largest number of registered voters.

All members of the commission shall serve until their successors are elected or appointed, as the case may be.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 68, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 9.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Judicial retirement and removal commission (now Judicial Conduct Commission), SCR 4.000 to 4.290.

34.320.
Compensation — Expenses.

Members of the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission who do not otherwise receive a salary from the State Treasury shall receive sixty dollars ($60) for each day they are in session or on official duty. All members shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses for each day they are in session or on official duty. All claims shall be approved by the Chief Justice or his designee and shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 68, § 4, effective March 23, 1976.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A part-time assistant county attorney who is appointed to the membership of the Kentucky judicial retirement and removal commission is not eligible to receive per diem compensation for his service on the commission in light of the clear language of this section.

OAG 80-127

.

34.330.
Oaths — Testimony — Evidence — Contempt proceedings.

In the exercise of its powers and duties, the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission may administer necessary oaths, take testimony under oath, compel the attendance of witnesses, and compel the production of records and other evidence. If any witness refuses to testify concerning any matter on which he may lawfully be interrogated, any Circuit Judge, on application of the commission may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 68, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 10.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Judicial retirement and removal commission (now Judicial Conduct Commission), SCR 4.030.

34.340.
Majority vote required.

No justice or judge shall be retired for disability or suspended without pay or removed for good cause except upon a majority vote of members of the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 68, § 2, effective March 23, 1976.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission (now Judicial Conduct Commission), see SCR 4.00 et seq.